Illinois, session 104th, SB895.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Clean Energy Jobs and Justice Fund 5Act is amended by changing Section 20-1 as follows: 6    (805 ILCS 155/20-1)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on September 15, 2045)8    Sec. 20-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 9the Clean Energy Jobs and Justice Fund Act. References in this 10Article to "this Act" mean this Article.11(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21.)